Massachusetts, session 194th, H5551.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Clause (ii) of the fifth sentence of subsection (c) of section 7 of chapter 372 of the acts
of 1984 is hereby amended by striking out the words “, provided that any collective bargaining
agreement may protect employees against such actions on arbitrary, capricious or unreasonable
grounds” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- for just cause.
of 1